data/spelling-dict/hunspell/pt_PT_90.aff
SFX Y   r               mos             ir              +P=1,N=p,T=pp
SFX Y   r               stes            ir              +P=2,N=p,T=pp
SFX Y   0               am              ir              +P=3,N=p,T=pp
SFX Y   0               a               ir              +P=1_3,N=s,T=pmp
SFX Y   0               as              ir              +P=2,N=s,T=pmp
SFX Y   ir              íramos          ir              +P=1,N=p,T=pmp
SFX Y   ir              íramo-nos       ir              +P=1,N=p,T=pmp
SFX Y   ir              íreis           ir              +P=2,N=p,T=pmp
SFX Y   0               am              ir              +P=3,N=p,T=pmp
SFX Y   0               ei              ir              +P=1,N=s,T=f
SFX Y   0               ás              ir              +P=2,N=s,T=f
SFX Y   0               á               ir              +P=3,N=s,T=f
SFX Y   0               emos            ir              +P=1,N=p,T=f
SFX Y   0               -nos-emos       ir              +P=1,N=p,T=f
SFX Y   0               eis             ir              +P=2,N=p,T=f
SFX Y   0               ão              ir              +P=3,N=p,T=f
SFX Y   r               sse             ir              +P=1_3,N=s,T=pic
SFX Y   r               sses            ir              +P=2,N=s,T=pic
SFX Y   ir              íssemos         ir              +P=1,N=p,T=pic
SFX Y   ir              íssemo-nos      ir              +P=1,N=p,T=pic
SFX Y   ir              ísseis          ir              +P=2,N=p,T=pic
SFX Y   r               ssem            ir              +P=3,N=p,T=pic
SFX Y   0               es              ir              +P=2,N=s,T=fc
SFX Y   0               mos             ir              +P=1,N=p,T=fc
SFX Y   0               mo-nos          ir           +P=1,N=p,T=fc
SFX Y   0               des             ir              +P=2,N=p,T=fc
SFX Y   0               em              ir              +P=3,N=p,T=fc
SFX Y   0               ia              ir              +P=1_3,N=s,T=c
SFX Y   0               ias             ir              +P=2,N=s,T=c
SFX Y   0               íamos           ir              +P=1,N=p,T=c
SFX Y   0               -nos-íamos      ir              +P=1,N=p,T=c
SFX Y   0               íeis            ir              +P=2,N=p,T=c
SFX Y   0               iam             ir              +P=3,N=p,T=c
SFX Y   r               ndo             ir              +T=g
SFX Y   r               do              ir              +G=m,N=s,T=ppa
SFX Y   r               da              ir              +G=f,N=s,T=ppa
SFX Y   r               dos             ir              +G=m,N=p,T=ppa
SFX Y   r               das             ir              +G=f,N=p,T=ppa

SFX Z Y 54
SFX Z   erir            iro             erir            +P=1,N=s,T=p
SFX Z   ir              es              erir            +P=2,N=s,T=p
SFX Z   ir              e               erir            +P=3,N=s,T=p
SFX Z   r               mos             erir            +P=1,N=p,T=p
SFX Z   r               s               erir            +P=2,N=p,T=p
SFX Z   ir              em              erir            +P=3,N=p,T=p
SFX Z   erir            ira             erir            +P=1_3,N=s,T=pc
SFX Z   erir            iras            erir            +P=2,N=s,T=pc
SFX Z   erir            iramos          erir            +P=1,N=p,T=pc
SFX Z   erir            iramo-nos       erir            +P=1,N=p,T=pc
SFX Z   erir            irais           erir            +P=2,N=p,T=pc
SFX Z   erir            iram            erir            +P=3,N=p,T=pc
SFX Z   ir              e               erir            +P=2,N=s,T=i
SFX Z   erir            ira             erir            +P=3,N=s,T=i
SFX Z   erir            iramos          erir            +P=1,N=p,T=i
SFX Z   erir            iramo-nos       erir            +P=1,N=p,T=i
SFX Z   ir              i               erir            +P=2,N=p,T=i
SFX Z   erir            iram            erir            +P=3,N=p,T=i
SFX Z   ar              io              ear             +P=1,N=s,T=p
SFX Z   ar              ias             ear             +P=2,N=s,T=p
SFX Z   ar              ia              ear             +P=3,N=s,T=p
SFX Z   r               mos             ear             +P=1,N=p,T=p
SFX Z   r               is              ear             +P=2,N=p,T=p
SFX Z   ar              iam             ear             +P=3,N=p,T=p
SFX Z   ar              ie              ear             +P=1_3,N=s,T=pc
SFX Z   ar              ies             ear             +P=2,N=s,T=pc
SFX Z   ar              emos            ear             +P=1,N=p,T=pc
SFX Z   ar              emo-nos         ear             +P=1,N=p,T=pc
SFX Z   ar              eis             ear             +P=2,N=p,T=pc
SFX Z   ar              iem             ear             +P=3,N=p,T=pc
SFX Z   ar              ia              ear             +P=2,N=s,T=i
SFX Z   ar              ie              ear             +P=3,N=s,T=i
SFX Z   ar              emos            ear             +P=1,N=p,T=i
SFX Z   ar              emo-nos         ear             +P=1,N=p,T=i
SFX Z   ar              ai              ear             +P=2,N=p,T=i
SFX Z   ar              iem             ear             +P=3,N=p,T=i
SFX Z   ir              o               uzir            +P=1,N=s,T=p
SFX Z   ir              es              uzir            +P=2,N=s,T=p
SFX Z   zir             z               uzir            +P=3,N=s,T=p
SFX Z   r               mos             uzir            +P=1,N=p,T=p
SFX Z   r               s               uzir            +P=2,N=p,T=p
SFX Z   ir              em              uzir            +P=3,N=p,T=p
SFX Z   ir              a               uzir            +P=1_3,N=s,T=pc
SFX Z   ir              as              uzir            +P=2,N=s,T=pc
SFX Z   ir              amos            uzir            +P=1,N=p,T=pc
SFX Z   ir              amo-nos         uzir            +P=1,N=p,T=pc
SFX Z   ir              ais             uzir            +P=2,N=p,T=pc
SFX Z   ir              am              uzir            +P=3,N=p,T=pc
SFX Z   zir             z               uzir            +P=2,N=s,T=i
SFX Z   ir              a               uzir            +P=3,N=s,T=i
SFX Z   ir              amos            uzir            +P=1,N=p,T=i
SFX Z   ir              amo-nos         uzir            +P=1,N=p,T=i
SFX Z   ir              i               uzir            +P=2,N=p,T=i
SFX Z   ir              am              uzir            +P=3,N=p,T=i
