data/spelling-dict/hunspell/pt_PT_90.dic
abduzir/ZYPL
abordar/XYPLDv
acalcar/XYPL
aceder/XYLn
acinzar/XYPLM
acompanhar/XYPLSMDn
acovardar/XYPL
adamascar/XYPL
aderir/ZYL
adjudicar/XYPLcD
adscrever/XYPL
aduzir/ZYL
aferir/ZYPLcMD
aferrar/XYPL
afocinhar/XYPL
afoguear/ZYPL
aformosear/ZYPL
afretar/XYPLM
agir/XYL
aguardar/XYPLD
ajuizar/YPLSD
alardear/ZYPLMD
alçar/XYPLMD
alfabetar/XYPL
aligeirar/XYPLM
alousar/XYPL
altear/ZYPLMD
alvorecer/XYPL
amarelar/XY
ameijoar/XYPL
amolecer/XYPLMD
amourar/XYPL
anavalhar/XYPL
aninhar/XYPLMD
anortear/ZYPL
anteocupar/XYPLcn
apalancar/XYPL
apartar/XYPLcMD
apear/ZYPLM
aperaltar/XYPL
aplaudir/XYPLv
apoteosar/XYPL
apropositar/XYPL
aquinhoar/XYPLM
arianizar/XYPL
arpear/ZYPL
arquear/ZYPLcMD
arrasar/XYPLD
arrelampar/XYPL
arrojar/XYPLMDB
arrotear/ZYPLMD
artilhar/XYPL
assear/ZYPLB
asserir/ZYL
assinar/XYPLcMnv
assombrear/ZYPLM
assorear/ZYPLM
assotar/XYPL
atarraxar/XYPLD
atijolar/XYPL
atontear/ZYPL
atracar/XYPLcD
aturdir/XYPLMD
auferir/ZYPLv
autorizar/XYPLcDv
avermelhar/XYPL
azarar/XY
bafar/XYL
balancear/ZYPLM
balsamar/XYPL
bambalear/ZYLn
bandear/ZYPLM
bandolear/ZYL
baquear/ZYL
baratear/ZYPLMD
barbear/ZYPLc
basear/ZYPL
batotear/ZYL
bazar/plZYL
bebericar/XYPL
bestificar/XYPLcDn
bigodear/ZYPL
bisbilhotar/XYL
biscatear/ZYL
bloquear/ZYPLSMDn
bobear/ZYL
boicotear/ZYPL
bombardear/ZYPLM
bombear/ZYPLM
borboletear/ZYL
borratar/XYPL
bracear/ZYL
brear/ZYPL
brevetar/XYPL
burburinhar/XYL
cabecear/ZYLM
cacetear/ZYPLc
cachear/ZYPL
calcorrear/ZYLDn
calejar/XYPLMD
calotear/ZYPL
cambalear/ZYLn
capitanear/ZYPL
capitular/XYLcn
capotear/ZYPL
carrear/ZYPLM
carretear/ZYPL
cascar/XYPL
cascatear/ZYL
catarrear/ZYL
cegar/XYPL
cercear/ZYPLDM
chalrear/ZYLD
chapear/ZYPL
chapinar/XYPL
chicotear/ZYPLD
cifrar/XYPLn
clarear/ZYPLc
clericalizar/XYPL
coicear/ZYL
colapsar/XY
comparticipar/XYPL
concitar/XYPL
conduzir/ZYPLRc
conglomerar/XYLc
consumir/YPLcDv
contornear/ZYPL
contrapontear/ZYPL
contrastear/ZYPL
cornear/ZYPLcD
corporalizar/XYPLc
costear/ZYPLM
crapulear/ZYL
crepusculizar/XYPL
dactilografar/XYPL
dedicar/XYPLcD
delinear/ZYPLcMD
democratizar/XYPLc
derrogar/XYPLcMDn
desarranchar/XYPL
descansar/XYPLB
desconversar/XYPLv
desencadear/ZYPLMnD
desenfadar/XYPL
desenlamear/ZYPL
desenxabir/XYPL
desferir/ZYPLM
desgrenhar/XYPL
desmobilar/XYPL
despiolhar/XYPLcM
destreinar/XYPL
devanear/ZYPLcD
dicionarizar/XYPLc
disponibilizar/XYLc
dopar/XY
dosear/ZYPLM
eletrolisar/XYPLc
embeber/XYPL
empalear/ZYLD
empossar/XYPL
encandear/ZYPLM
encapotar/XYPLB
enchumaçar/XYPL
endeusar/XYPLMD
enfear/ZYPL
enfortecer/XYPL
enjaular/XYPL
enlear/ZYPLc
ensaboar/XYPLSM
entear/ZYPL
entrançar/XYPLD
envidar/XYPL
esbofetear/ZYPLD
esbordar/XYPLMn
esclarecer/XYPLMD
esfaquear/ZYPLMD
esfumaçar/XYPL
espavorir/YPL
espernear/ZYL
esquecer/XYPLMD
estofar/XYPLD
estontear/ZYPLMDn
esventrar/XYPL
exigir/XYPLv
extravaganciar/XYPL
falsear/ZYPLM
fanicar/XYL
ferir/ZYPLMD
fichar/XYPL
flautear/ZYPL
focar/XYPL
foguear/ZYPL
franquear/ZYPLv
franquiar/XYL
frasear/ZYLDM
galantear/ZYLD
galear/ZYPL
galhardear/ZYPL
gazetear/ZYL
gentilizar/XYPL
gerir/ZYPL
golear/ZYPLMD
gotear/ZYL
gradar/XYPLcD
granjear/ZYPLD
guerrear/ZYPLD
habilitar/XYPLScDn
harpear/ZYPL
homenagear/ZYPL
horripilar/XYPLcDn
imparcializar/XYPL
inaugurar/XYPLcD
indicar/XYPLcD
induzir/ZYPLMD
informar/XYPLcDnS
ingerir/ZYPL
instanciar/XYPLc
interromper/XYPL
introduzir/ZYPLR
ironizar/XYPL
laçar/XYPLD
lacrear/ZYPL
lajear/ZYPLMD
lancear/ZYPLD
lascar/XYPL
laurear/ZYPL
libertar/XYPLcD
lotear/ZYPLM
lucrar/XYPL
macaquear/ZYPLcD
malparir/XYL
maluquear/ZYL
marear/ZYPLcn
marejar/XYL
marotear/ZYL
matraquear/ZYPLD
maximizar/XYLc
mercadejar/XYP
metamorfosear/ZYPL
ministrar/XYPLcDn
monetizar/XYPL
mosquetear/ZYPL
mungir/XYPLM
neviscar/XYL
nordestear/ZYL
nortear/ZYPLcS
obrar/XYPLDn
ombrear/ZYL
onzenar/XYL
ourar/XYPL
pactear/ZYL
pagodear/ZYL
palmear/ZYPLD
palpabilizar/XYPL
pantear/ZYL
parafrasear/ZYPLD
parentear/ZYL
participar/XYPLcDnv
pastorear/ZYPLc
patentear/ZYPLc
patronear/ZYPL
pedantear/ZYL
peraltear/ZYL
perecer/XYLMv
pespegar/XYPL
pestanear/ZYL
piratear/ZYPL
plagiar/XYPLD
pontapear/ZYPL
pornografar/XYPL
pracear/ZYPL
prazentear/ZYPL
predeterminar/XYPLcn
presentear/ZYPLD
presidir/XYL
produzir/ZYPLDv
profetizar/XYPLD
propagandear/ZYPLMnD
protelar/XYPLcDM
quaresmar/XYL
quartear/ZYPL
raiar/XYPL
ralear/ZYPLM
rastear/ZYPL
reabastecer/XYPLM
rebolear/ZYPL
recensear/ZYPLMD
recomprar/XYPL
recrear/ZYPLcD
reduplicar/XYPLc
reduzir/ZYPLv
refornecer/XYPLM
refrear/ZYPLMDv
regenerador/fpZ
regenerar/XYPLcDnvZ
regenerescência/phZ
reincitar/XYPLM
relampaguear/ZYLMn
remediar/YPLScDv
renomear/ZYPL
repatriar/XYPLM
rescrever/XYPL
ressaltear/ZYPL
ressorver/XYPL
retraduzir/ZYPL
retroceder/XYPLMn
ribombar/XYLn
ricochetear/ZYL
roncear/ZYL
ruborescer/XYL
saborear/ZYPL
salvaguardar/XYPL
sapatear/ZYPLD
seduzir/ZYPLv
seguir/YPLMDn
serpear/ZYLn
silabar/XYPL
sobrancear/ZYPL
sobreirritar/XYPL
soluçar/XYPLn
sombrear/ZYPL
sublimar/XYPLcv
sugerir/ZYPLv
sumariar/XYPL
tacanhear/ZYL
tatear/ZYPLMnv
tapear/ZYPLc
temporalizar/XYPL
tiquetaquear/ZYL
toirear/ZYLD
tontear/ZYL
torrear/ZYPL
tragar/XYPLMDv
translinear/ZYc
transubstanciar/XYPLc
tratantear/ZYL
tremeluzir/ZYLM
tripudiar/XY
universalizar/XYPLc
vagabundear/ZYL
vanguardear/ZYPL
vassourar/XYPL
veranear/ZYLn
vesguear/ZYL
vibrar/XYPLcDn
vivificar/XYPLcDn
ziguezaguear/ZYLn
autoproclamar/XYPLcD
atear/DLPXYZn
folhear/DLPYZcmp
titular/LPXYcdp
pleitear/ZYL
miscigenar/ZYL
recomputar/ZYL
descalibrar/ZYL
entrecruzar/ZYL
bombar/ZYL
enrabar/ZYL
desembuchar/ZYL
empoderar/ZYL
cultuar/ZYL
desconfinar/ZYL
desalarmar/ZYL
obviar/ZYL
viralizar/ZYL
esbardalhar/ZYL
autoexperimentar/ZYL
eutanasiar/ZYL
teletransportar/ZYL
peidar/ZYL
enaipar/ZYL
esgargalar/ZYL
